updates/files/_internal/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_bg_BG.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
а1
ъ1
о1
у1
е1
и1
ю1
я1
й1
б1
в1
г1
д1
ж1
з1
к1
л1
м1
н1
п1
р1
с1
т1
ф1
х1
ц1
ч1
ш1
щ1
д4ж1
д4з1
.б8
.без1на4д5з1
.б2е1
.бе2з1
.безн4
.безн2а1
.безна2д1
.н8
.на4д5з1
.н2а1
.на2д1
.на4д5ж1
.п8
.по4д5з1
.п2о1
.по2д1
.по4д5ж1
.пр8
.пре4д5з1
.пр2е1
.пре2д1
.пре4д5ж1
.на5д6жа2в1
.на3дж2а1
.на5д6жа2с1
.по5д6жа2в1
.по3дж2а1
.по5д6жу2р1
.по3дж2у1
.й8
8й.
.4й1й8
4й1й4
8й8й.
.в8
.вй8
.4в4й1й8
.с8
.сй8
.4с4й1й8
.й2б8
й2б1
8й8б.
.вй2б8
.сй2б8
.й2в8
й2в1
8й8в.
.4в1й2в8
.сй2в8
.й2г8
й2г1
8й8г.
.вй2г8
.сй2г8
.й2д8
й2д1
8й8д.
.вй2д8
.сй2д8
.й2ж8
й2ж1
8й8ж.
.вй2ж8
.сй2ж8
.й2з8
й2з1
8й8з.
.вй2з8
.4сй2з8
.й2к8
й2к1
8й8к.
.вй2к8
.сй2к8
.й2л8
й2л1
8й8л.
.вй2л8
.сй2л8
.й2м8
й2м1
8й8м.
.вй2м8
.сй2м8
.й2н8
й2н1
8й8н.
.вй2н8
.сй2н8
.й2п8
й2п1
8й8п.
.вй2п8
.сй2п8
.й2р8
й2р1
8й8р.
.вй2р8
.сй2р8
.й2с8
й2с1
8й8с.
.вй2с8
.4с1й2с8
.й2т8
й2т1
8й8т.
.вй2т8
.сй2т8
.й2ф8
й2ф1
8й8ф.
.4вй2ф8
.сй2ф8
.й2х8
й2х1
8й8х.
.вй2х8
.сй2х8
.й2ц8
й2ц1
8й8ц.
.вй2ц8
.сй2ц8
.й2ч8
й2ч1
8й8ч.
.вй2ч8
.сй2ч8
.й2ш8
й2ш1
8й8ш.
.вй2ш8
.сй2ш8
.й2щ8
й2щ1
8й8щ.
.вй2щ8
.сй2щ8
8б.
.бй8
бй4
8б8й.
.вб8
.вбй8
.сб8
.сбй8
.4б1б8
4б1б4
8б8б.
.4в4б1б8
.4с4б1б8
.бв8
8б8в.
бв1
.4в1бв8
.сбв8
.бг8
8б8г.
бг1
.вбг8
.сбг8
.бд8
8б8д.
бд1
.вбд8
.сбд8
.бж8
8б8ж.
бж1
.вбж8
.сбж8
.бз8
8б8з.
бз1
.вбз8
.4сбз8
.бк8
8б8к.
бк1
.вбк8
.сбк8
.бл8
бл4
8б8л.
.вбл8
.сбл8
.бм8
бм4
8б8м.
.вбм8
.сбм8
.бн8
бн4
8б8н.
.вбн8
.сбн8
.4бп8
4бп4
8б8п.
.4в4бп8
.4с4бп8
.бр8
бр4
8б8р.
.вбр8
.сбр8
.бс8
8б8с.
бс1
.вбс8
.4с1бс8
.бт8
8б8т.
бт1
.вбт8
.сбт8
.бф8
8б8ф.
бф1
.4вбф8
.сбф8
.бх8
8б8х.
бх1
.вбх8
.сбх8
.бц8
8б8ц.
бц1
.вбц8
.сбц8
.бч8
8б8ч.
бч1
.вбч8
.сбч8
.бш8
8б8ш.
бш1
.вбш8
.сбш8
.бщ8
8б8щ.
бщ1
.вбщ8
.сбщ8
8в.
вй4
8в8й.
.4в1в8
.ввй8
.св8
.свй8
8в8б.
вб1
.ввб8
.свб8
4в1в4
8в8в.
.4в4в4в8
.4с4в1в8
.вг8
8в8г.
вг1
.ввг8
.свг8
.вд8
8в8д.
вд1
.ввд8
.свд8
.вж8
8в8ж.
вж1
.ввж8
.свж8
.вз8
8в8з.
вз1
.ввз8
.4свз8
.вк8
8в8к.
вк1
.ввк8
.свк8
.вл8
вл4
8в8л.
.ввл8
.свл8
.вм8
вм4
8в8м.
.ввм8
.свм8
.вн8
вн4
8в8н.
.ввн8
.свн8
.вп8
8в8п.
вп1
.ввп8
.свп8
.вр8
вр4
8в8р.
.ввр8
.свр8
.вс8
8в8с.
вс1
.ввс8
.4с1вс8
.вт8
8в8т.
вт1
.ввт8
.свт8
.4вф8
4вф4
8в8ф.
.в4вф8
.4с4вф8
.вх8
8в8х.
вх1
.ввх8
.свх8
.вц8
8в8ц.
вц1
.ввц8
.свц8
.вч8
8в8ч.
вч1
.ввч8
.свч8
.вш8
8в8ш.
вш1
.ввш8
.свш8
.вщ8
8в8щ.
вщ1
.ввщ8
.свщ8
.г8
8г.
.гй8
гй4
8г8й.
.вгй8
.сг8
.сгй8
.гб8
8г8б.
гб1
.вгб8
.сгб8
.гв8
8г8в.
гв1
.4в1гв8
.сгв8
.4г1г8
4г1г4
8г8г.
.4в4г1г8
.4с4г1г8
.гд8
8г8д.
гд1
.вгд8
.сгд8
.гж8
8г8ж.
гж1
.вгж8
.сгж8
.гз8
8г8з.
гз1
.вгз8
.4сгз8
.4гк8
4гк4
8г8к.
.4в4гк8
.4с4гк8
.гл8
гл4
8г8л.
.вгл8
.сгл8
.гм8
гм4
8г8м.
.вгм8
.сгм8
.гн8
гн4
8г8н.
.вгн8
.сгн8
.гп8
8г8п.
гп1
.вгп8
.сгп8
.гр8
гр4
8г8р.
.вгр8
.сгр8
.гс8
8г8с.
гс1
.вгс8
.4с1гс8
.гт8
8г8т.
гт1
.вгт8
.сгт8
.гф8
8г8ф.
гф1
.4вгф8
.сгф8
.гх8
8г8х.
гх1
.вгх8
.сгх8
.гц8
8г8ц.
гц1
.вгц8
.сгц8
.гч8
8г8ч.
гч1
.вгч8
.сгч8
.гш8
8г8ш.
гш1
.вгш8
.сгш8
.гщ8
8г8щ.
гщ1
.вгщ8
.сгщ8
.д8
8д.
.дй8
дй4
8д8й.
.вдй8
.сд8
.сдй8
.дб8
8д8б.
дб1
.вдб8
.сдб8
.дв8
8д8в.
дв1
.4в1дв8
.сдв8
.дг8
8д8г.
дг1
.вдг8
.сдг8
.4д1д8
4д1д4
8д8д.
.4в4д1д8
.4с4д1д8
.д4ж8
8д8ж.
.вд4ж8
.сд4ж8
.д4з8
8д8з.
.вд4з8
.4сд4з8
.дк8
8д8к.
дк1
.вдк8
.сдк8
.дл8
дл4
8д8л.
.вдл8
.сдл8
.дм8
дм4
8д8м.
.вдм8
.сдм8
.дн8
дн4
8д8н.
.вдн8
.сдн8
.дп8
8д8п.
дп1
.вдп8
.сдп8
.др8
др4
8д8р.
.вдр8
.сдр8
.дс8
8д8с.
дс1
.вдс8
.4с1дс8
.4дт8
4дт4
8д8т.
.4в4дт8
.4с4дт8
.дф8
8д8ф.
дф1
.4вдф8
.сдф8
.дх8
8д8х.
дх1
.вдх8
.сдх8
.дц8
8д8ц.
дц1
.вдц8
.сдц8
.дч8
8д8ч.
дч1
.вдч8
.сдч8
.дш8
8д8ш.
дш1
.вдш8
.сдш8
.дщ8
8д8щ.
дщ1
.вдщ8
.сдщ8
.ж8
8ж.
.жй8
жй4
8ж8й.
.вжй8
.сж8
.сжй8
.жб8
8ж8б.
жб1
.вжб8
.сжб8
.жв8
8ж8в.
жв1
.4в1жв8
.сжв8
.жг8
8ж8г.
жг1
.вжг8
.сжг8
.жд8
8ж8д.
жд1
.вжд8
.сжд8
.4ж1ж8
4ж1ж4
8ж8ж.
.4в4ж1ж8
.4с4ж1ж8
.жз8
8ж8з.
жз1
.вжз8
.4сжз8
.жк8
8ж8к.
жк1
.вжк8
.сжк8
.жл8
жл4
8ж8л.
.вжл8
.сжл8
.жм8
жм4
8ж8м.
.вжм8
.сжм8
.жн8
жн4
8ж8н.
.вжн8
.сжн8
.жп8
8ж8п.
жп1
.вжп8
.сжп8
.жр8
жр4
8ж8р.
.вжр8
.сжр8
.жс8
8ж8с.
жс1
.вжс8
.4с1жс8
.жт8
8ж8т.
жт1
.вжт8
.сжт8
.жф8
8ж8ф.
жф1
.4вжф8
.сжф8
.жх8
8ж8х.
жх1
.вжх8
.сжх8
.жц8
8ж8ц.
жц1
.вжц8
.сжц8
.жч8
8ж8ч.
жч1
.вжч8
.сжч8
.4жш8
4жш4
8ж8ш.
.4в4жш8
.4с4жш8
.жщ8
8ж8щ.
жщ1
.вжщ8
.сжщ8
.з8
8з.
.зй8
зй4
8з8й.
.взй8
.4сз8
.сзй8
.зб8
8з8б.
зб1
.взб8
.сзб8
.зв8
8з8в.
зв1
.4в1зв8
.сзв8
.зг8
8з8г.
зг1
.взг8
.сзг8
.зд8
8з8д.
зд1
.взд8
.сзд8
.зж8
8з8ж.
зж1
.взж8
.сзж8
.4з1з8
4з1з4
8з8з.
.4в4з1з8
.4с4з1з8
.зк8
8з8к.
зк1
.взк8
.сзк8
.зл8
зл4
8з8л.
.взл8
.сзл8
.зм8
зм4
8з8м.
.взм8
.сзм8
.зн8
зн4
8з8н.
.взн8
.сзн8
.зп8
8з8п.
зп1
.взп8
.сзп8
.зр8
зр4
8з8р.
.взр8
.сзр8
.4зс8
4зс4
8з8с.
.4в4зс8
.4с4зс8
.зт8
8з8т.
зт1
.взт8
.сзт8
.зф8
8з8ф.
зф1
.4взф8
.сзф8
.зх8
8з8х.
зх1
.взх8
.сзх8
.зц8
8з8ц.
зц1
.взц8
.сзц8
.зч8
8з8ч.
зч1
.взч8
.сзч8
.зш8
8з8ш.
зш1
.взш8
.сзш8
.зщ8
8з8щ.
зщ1
.взщ8
.сзщ8
.к8
8к.
.кй8
кй4
8к8й.
.вкй8
.ск8
.скй8
.кб8
8к8б.
кб1
.вкб8
.скб8
.кв8
8к8в.
кв1
.4в1кв8
.скв8
.4кг8
4кг4
8к8г.
.4в4кг8
.4с4кг8
.кд8
8к8д.
кд1
.вкд8
.скд8
.кж8
8к8ж.
кж1
.вкж8
.скж8
.кз8
8к8з.
кз1
.вкз8
.4скз8
.4к1к8
4к1к4
8к8к.
.4в4к1к8
.4с4к1к8
.кл8
кл4
8к8л.
.вкл8
.скл8
.км8
км4
8к8м.
.вкм8
.скм8
.кн8
кн4
8к8н.
.вкн8
.скн8
.кп8
8к8п.
кп1
.вкп8
.скп8
.кр8
кр4
8к8р.
.вкр8
.скр8
.кс8
8к8с.
кс1
.вкс8
.4с1кс8
.кт8
8к8т.
кт1
.вкт8
.скт8
.кф8
8к8ф.
кф1
.4вкф8
.скф8
.кх8
8к8х.
кх1
.вкх8
.скх8
.кц8
8к8ц.
кц1
.вкц8
.скц8
.кч8
8к8ч.
кч1
.вкч8
.скч8
.кш8
8к8ш.
кш1
.вкш8
.скш8
.кщ8
8к8щ.
кщ1
.вкщ8
.скщ8
.л8
8л.
.лй8
8л8й.
лй1
.влй8
.сл8
.слй8
.лб8
8л8б.
лб1
.влб8
.слб8
.лв8
8л8в.
лв1
.4в1лв8
.слв8
.лг8
8л8г.
лг1
.влг8
.слг8
.лд8
8л8д.
лд1
.влд8
.слд8
.лж8
8л8ж.
лж1
.влж8
.слж8
.лз8
8л8з.
лз1
.влз8
.4слз8
.лк8
8л8к.
лк1
.влк8
.слк8
.4л1л8
4л1л4
8л8л.
.4в4л1л8
.4с4л1л8
.лм8
8л8м.
лм1
.влм8
.слм8
.лн8
8л8н.
лн1
.влн8
.слн8
.лп8
8л8п.
лп1
.влп8
.слп8
.лр8
8л8р.
лр1
.влр8
.слр8
.лс8
8л8с.
лс1
.влс8
.4с1лс8
.лт8
8л8т.
лт1
.влт8
.слт8
.лф8
8л8ф.
лф1
.4влф8
.слф8
.лх8
8л8х.
лх1
.влх8
.слх8
.лц8
8л8ц.
лц1
.влц8
.слц8
.лч8
8л8ч.
лч1
.влч8
.слч8
.лш8
8л8ш.
лш1
.влш8
.слш8
.лщ8
8л8щ.
лщ1
.влщ8
.слщ8
.м8
8м.
.мй8
8м8й.
мй1
.вмй8
.см8
.смй8
.мб8
8м8б.
мб1
.вмб8
.смб8
.мв8
8м8в.
мв1
.4в1мв8
.смв8
.мг8
8м8г.
мг1
.вмг8
.смг8
.мд8
8м8д.
мд1
.вмд8
.смд8
.мж8
8м8ж.
мж1
.вмж8
.смж8
.мз8
8м8з.
мз1
.вмз8
.4смз8
.мк8
8м8к.
мк1
.вмк8
.смк8
.мл8
8м8л.
мл1
.вмл8
.смл8
.4м1м8
4м1м4
8м8м.
.4в4м1м8
.4с4м1м8
.мн8
8м8н.
мн1
.вмн8
.смн8
.мп8
8м8п.
мп1
.вмп8
.смп8
.мр8
8м8р.
мр1
.вмр8
.смр8
.мс8
8м8с.
мс1
.вмс8
.4с1мс8
.мт8
8м8т.
мт1
.вмт8
.смт8
.мф8
8м8ф.
мф1
.4вмф8
.смф8
.мх8
8м8х.
мх1
.вмх8
.смх8
.мц8
8м8ц.
мц1
.вмц8
.смц8
.мч8
8м8ч.
мч1
.вмч8
.смч8
.мш8
8м8ш.
мш1
.вмш8
.смш8
.мщ8
8м8щ.
мщ1
.вмщ8
.смщ8
8н.
.нй8
8н8й.
нй1
.внй8
.сн8
.снй8
.нб8
8н8б.
нб1
.внб8
.снб8
.нв8
8н8в.
нв1
.4в1нв8
.снв8
.нг8
8н8г.
нг1
.внг8
.снг8
.нд8
8н8д.
нд1
.внд8
.снд8
.нж8
8н8ж.
нж1
.внж8
.снж8
.нз8
8н8з.
нз1
.внз8
.4снз8
.нк8
8н8к.
нк1
.внк8
.снк8
.нл8
8н8л.
нл1
.внл8
.снл8
.нм8
8н8м.
нм1
.внм8
.снм8
.4н1н8
4н1н4
8н8н.
.4в4н1н8
.4с4н1н8
.нп8
8н8п.
нп1
.внп8
.снп8
.нр8
8н8р.
нр1
.внр8
.снр8
.нс8
8н8с.
нс1
.внс8
.4с1нс8
.нт8
8н8т.
нт1
.внт8
.снт8
.нф8
8н8ф.
нф1
.4внф8
.снф8
.нх8
8н8х.
нх1
.внх8
.снх8
.нц8
8н8ц.
нц1
.внц8
.снц8
.нч8
8н8ч.
нч1
.внч8
.снч8
.нш8
8н8ш.
нш1
.внш8
.снш8
.нщ8
8н8щ.
нщ1
.внщ8
.снщ8
8п.
.пй8
пй4
8п8й.
.впй8
.сп8
.спй8
.4пб8
4пб4
8п8б.
.4в4пб8
.4с4пб8
.пв8
8п8в.
пв1
.4в1пв8
.спв8
.пг8
8п8г.
пг1
.впг8
.спг8
.пд8
8п8д.
пд1
.впд8
.спд8
.пж8
8п8ж.
пж1
.впж8
.спж8
.пз8
8п8з.
пз1
.впз8
.4спз8
.пк8
8п8к.
пк1
.впк8
.спк8
.пл8
пл4
8п8л.
.впл8
.спл8
.пм8
пм4
8п8м.
.впм8
.спм8
.пн8
пн4
8п8н.
.впн8
.спн8
.4п1п8
4п1п4
8п8п.
.4в4п1п8
.4с4п1п8
пр4
8п8р.
.впр8
.спр8
.пс8
8п8с.
пс1
.впс8
.4с1пс8
.пт8
8п8т.
пт1
.впт8
.спт8
.пф8
8п8ф.
пф1
.4впф8
.спф8
.пх8
8п8х.
пх1
.впх8
.спх8
.пц8
8п8ц.
пц1
.впц8
.спц8
.пч8
8п8ч.
пч1
.впч8
.спч8
.пш8
8п8ш.
пш1
.впш8
.спш8
.пщ8
8п8щ.
пщ1
.впщ8
.спщ8
.р8
8р.
.рй8
8р8й.
рй1
.врй8
.ср8
.срй8
.рб8
8р8б.
рб1
.врб8
.срб8
.рв8
8р8в.
рв1
.4в1рв8
.срв8
.рг8
8р8г.
рг1
.врг8
.срг8
.рд8
8р8д.
рд1
.врд8
.срд8
.рж8
8р8ж.
рж1
.врж8
.срж8
.рз8
8р8з.
рз1
.врз8
.4срз8
.рк8
8р8к.
рк1
.врк8
.срк8
.рл8
8р8л.
рл1
.врл8
.срл8
.рм8
8р8м.
рм1
.врм8
.срм8
.рн8
8р8н.
рн1
.врн8
.срн8
.рп8
8р8п.
рп1
.врп8
.срп8
.4р1р8
4р1р4
8р8р.
.4в4р1р8
.4с4р1р8
.рс8
8р8с.
рс1
.врс8
.4с1рс8
.рт8
8р8т.
рт1
.врт8
.срт8
.рф8
8р8ф.
рф1
.4врф8
.срф8
.рх8
8р8х.
рх1
.врх8
.срх8
.рц8
8р8ц.
рц1
.врц8
.срц8
.рч8
8р8ч.
рч1
.врч8
.срч8
.рш8
8р8ш.
рш1
.врш8
.срш8
.рщ8
8р8щ.
рщ1
.врщ8
.срщ8
8с.
сй4
8с8й.
.всй8
.4с1с8
.ссй8
8с8б.
сб1
.всб8
.ссб8
8с8в.
св1
.4в1св8
.ссв8
8с8г.
сг1
.всг8
.ссг8
8с8д.
сд1
.всд8
.ссд8
8с8ж.
сж1
.всж8
.ссж8
4сз4
8с8з.
.4в4сз8
.с4сз8
8с8к.
ск1
.вск8
.сск8
сл4
8с8л.
.всл8
.ссл8
см4
8с8м.
.всм8
.ссм8
сн4
8с8н.
.всн8
.ссн8
8с8п.
сп1
.всп8
.ссп8
ср4
8с8р.
.вср8
.сср8
4с1с4
8с8с.
.4в4с1с8
.4с4с4с8
.ст8
8с8т.
ст1
.вст8
.сст8
.сф8
8с8ф.
сф1
.4всф8
.ссф8
.сх8
8с8х.
сх1
.всх8
.ссх8
.сц8
8с8ц.
сц1
.всц8
.ссц8
.сч8
8с8ч.
сч1
.всч8
.ссч8
.сш8
8с8ш.
сш1
.всш8
.ссш8
.сщ8
8с8щ.
сщ1
.всщ8
.ссщ8
.т8
8т.
.тй8
тй4
8т8й.
.втй8
.стй8
.тб8
8т8б.
тб1
.втб8
.стб8
.тв8
8т8в.
тв1
.4в1тв8
.ств8
.тг8
8т8г.
тг1
.втг8
.стг8
.4тд8
4тд4
8т8д.
.4в4тд8
.4с4тд8
.тж8
8т8ж.
тж1
.втж8
.стж8
.тз8
8т8з.
тз1
.втз8
.4стз8
.тк8
8т8к.
тк1
.втк8
.стк8
.тл8
тл4
8т8л.
.втл8
.стл8
.тм8
тм4
8т8м.
.втм8
.стм8
.тн8
тн4
8т8н.
.втн8
.стн8
.тп8
8т8п.
тп1
.втп8
.стп8
.тр8
тр4
8т8р.
.втр8
.стр8
.тс8
8т8с.
тс1
.втс8
.4с1тс8
.4т1т8
4т1т4
8т8т.
.4в4т1т8
.4с4т1т8
.тф8
8т8ф.
тф1
.4втф8
.стф8
.тх8
8т8х.
тх1
.втх8
.стх8
.тц8
8т8ц.
тц1
.втц8
.стц8
.тч8
8т8ч.
тч1
.втч8
.стч8
.тш8
8т8ш.
тш1
.втш8
.стш8
.тщ8
8т8щ.
тщ1
.втщ8
.стщ8
.ф8
8ф.
.фй8
фй4
8ф8й.
.вфй8
.сфй8
.фб8
8ф8б.
фб1
.вфб8
.сфб8
.4фв8
4фв4
8ф8в.
.4в4фв8
.4с4фв8
.фг8
8ф8г.
фг1
.вфг8
.сфг8
.фд8
8ф8д.
фд1
.вфд8
.сфд8
.фж8
8ф8ж.
фж1
.вфж8
.сфж8
.фз8
8ф8з.
фз1
.вфз8
.4сфз8
.фк8
8ф8к.
фк1
.вфк8
.сфк8
.фл8
фл4
8ф8л.
.вфл8
.сфл8
.фм8
фм4
8ф8м.
.вфм8
.сфм8
.фн8
фн4
8ф8н.
.вфн8
.сфн8
.фп8
8ф8п.
фп1
.вфп8
.сфп8
.фр8
фр4
8ф8р.
.вфр8
.сфр8
.фс8
8ф8с.
фс1
.вфс8
.4с1фс8
.фт8
8ф8т.
фт1
.вфт8
.сфт8
.4ф1ф8
4ф1ф4
8ф8ф.
.4в4ф1ф8
.4с4ф1ф8
.фх8
8ф8х.
фх1
.вфх8
.сфх8
.фц8
8ф8ц.
фц1
.вфц8
.сфц8
.фч8
8ф8ч.
фч1
.вфч8
.сфч8
.фш8
8ф8ш.
фш1
.вфш8
.сфш8
.фщ8
8ф8щ.
фщ1
.вфщ8
.сфщ8
.х8
8х.
.хй8
хй4
8х8й.
.вхй8
.схй8
.хб8
8х8б.
хб1
.вхб8
.схб8
.хв8
8х8в.
хв1
.4в1хв8
.схв8
.хг8
8х8г.
хг1
.вхг8
.схг8
.хд8
8х8д.
хд1
.вхд8
.схд8
.хж8
8х8ж.
хж1
.вхж8
.схж8
.хз8
8х8з.
хз1
.вхз8
.4схз8
.хк8
8х8к.
хк1
.вхк8
.схк8
.хл8
хл4
8х8л.
.вхл8
.схл8
.хм8
хм4
8х8м.
.вхм8
.схм8
.хн8
хн4
8х8н.
.вхн8
.схн8
.хп8
8х8п.
хп1
.вхп8
.схп8
.хр8
хр4
8х8р.
.вхр8
.схр8
.хс8
8х8с.
хс1
.вхс8
.4с1хс8
.хт8
8х8т.
хт1
.вхт8
.схт8
.хф8
8х8ф.
хф1
.4вхф8
.схф8
.4х1х8
4х1х4
8х8х.
.4в4х1х8
.4с4х1х8
.хц8
8х8ц.
хц1
.вхц8
.схц8
.хч8
8х8ч.
хч1
.вхч8
.схч8
.хш8
8х8ш.
хш1
.вхш8
.схш8
.хщ8
8х8щ.
хщ1
.вхщ8
.схщ8
.ц8
8ц.
.цй8
цй4
8ц8й.
.вцй8
.сцй8
.цб8
8ц8б.
цб1
.вцб8
.сцб8
.цв8
8ц8в.
цв1
.4в1цв8
.сцв8
.цг8
8ц8г.
цг1
.вцг8
.сцг8
.цд8
8ц8д.
цд1
.вцд8
.сцд8
.цж8
8ц8ж.
цж1
.вцж8
.сцж8
.цз8
8ц8з.
цз1
.вцз8
.4сцз8
.цк8
8ц8к.
цк1
.вцк8
.сцк8
.цл8
цл4
8ц8л.
.вцл8
.сцл8
.цм8
цм4
8ц8м.
.вцм8
.сцм8
.цн8
цн4
8ц8н.
.вцн8
.сцн8
.цп8
8ц8п.
цп1
.вцп8
.сцп8
.цр8
цр4
8ц8р.
.вцр8
.сцр8
.цс8
8ц8с.
цс1
.вцс8
.4с1цс8
.цт8
8ц8т.
цт1
.вцт8
.сцт8
.цф8
8ц8ф.
цф1
.4вцф8
.сцф8
.цх8
8ц8х.
цх1
.вцх8
.сцх8
.4ц1ц8
4ц1ц4
8ц8ц.
.4в4ц1ц8
.4с4ц1ц8
.4цч8
4цч4
8ц8ч.
.4в4цч8
.4с4цч8
.цш8
8ц8ш.
цш1
.вцш8
.сцш8
.цщ8
8ц8щ.
цщ1
.вцщ8
.сцщ8
.ч8
8ч.
.чй8
чй4
8ч8й.
.вчй8
.счй8
.чб8
8ч8б.
чб1
.вчб8
.счб8
.чв8
8ч8в.
чв1
.4в1чв8
.счв8
.чг8
8ч8г.
чг1
.вчг8
.счг8
.чд8
8ч8д.
чд1
.вчд8
.счд8
.чж8
8ч8ж.
чж1
.вчж8
.счж8
.чз8
8ч8з.
чз1
.вчз8
.4счз8
.чк8
8ч8к.
чк1
.вчк8
.счк8
.чл8
чл4
8ч8л.
.вчл8
.счл8
.чм8
чм4
8ч8м.
.вчм8
.счм8
.чн8
чн4
8ч8н.
.вчн8
.счн8
.чп8
8ч8п.
чп1
.вчп8
.счп8
.чр8
чр4
8ч8р.
.вчр8
.счр8
.чс8
8ч8с.
чс1
.вчс8
.4с1чс8
.чт8
8ч8т.
чт1
.вчт8
.счт8
.чф8
8ч8ф.
чф1
.4вчф8
.счф8
.чх8
8ч8х.
чх1
.вчх8
.счх8
.4чц8
4чц4
8ч8ц.
.4в4чц8
.4с4чц8
.4ч1ч8
4ч1ч4
8ч8ч.
.4в4ч1ч8
.4с4ч1ч8
.чш8
8ч8ш.
чш1
.вчш8
.счш8
.чщ8
8ч8щ.
чщ1
.вчщ8
.счщ8
.ш8
8ш.
.шй8
шй4
8ш8й.
.вшй8
.сшй8
.шб8
8ш8б.
шб1
.вшб8
.сшб8
.шв8
8ш8в.
шв1
.4в1шв8
.сшв8
.шг8
8ш8г.
шг1
.вшг8
.сшг8
.шд8
8ш8д.
шд1
.вшд8
.сшд8
.4шж8
4шж4
8ш8ж.
.4в4шж8
.4с4шж8
.шз8
8ш8з.
шз1
.вшз8
.4сшз8
.шк8
8ш8к.
шк1
.вшк8
.сшк8
.шл8
шл4
8ш8л.
.вшл8
.сшл8
.шм8
